Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-901
Copersonal representatives, cotrustees, coguardians, or coconservators; authority to act.

On and after January 1, 2020, in any case in which copersonal representatives, cotrustees, coguardians, or coconservators have been appointed, unless specifically restricted in a will, a trust, or an order of appointment, such copersonal representatives, cotrustees, coguardians, or coconservators shall have the authority to act independently with respect to, and shall not be required to act in concert with respect to, banking transactions involving trust or estate assets.

Laws 2019, LB55, § 2.